Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB627.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 22, 1978 (P.L.1166, No.274), referred to as the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.3. Public Safety Resident Communications Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The Public Safety Resident Communications Pilot Program is established in the commission.(b) Administration.--The program shall provide grants to law enforcement agencies to support the purchase and implementation of community engagement software to the extent funding is made available to the program.1234567891011121314151617181920 (c) Applications.--The commission shall prescribe the form and manner in which an application may be submitted to receive a grant award under the program.(d) Use of grants.--Law enforcement agencies may use a grant award under this program to support the purchase and implementation of community engagement software. The software shall:(1) Supplement and integrate with the existing public safety notification systems, including computer-aided dispatch systems, victims' notification systems or other notification systems of the law enforcement agency.(2) Not duplicate existing public safety notification systems under paragraph (1).(3) Meet law enforcement notification responsibilities under the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the "Crime Victims Act."(e) Supplement not supplant.--Grant money allocated through the program shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funding. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a law enforcement agency from making an application to receive a grant award under the program in a subsequent year for the same purpose and amount as in a prior year.(f) Diversity.--The commission shall ensure that grant awards made under the program are geographically dispersed throughout this Commonwealth.(g) Performance metrics.--The commission shall include performance metrics to measure the progress of grants awarded under the program.(h) Confidentiality.--A record created or obtained through the implementation or operation of the program shall be 20250HB0627PN1947 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 confidential and is exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(I) PROTECTIONS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT AND COMMUNITY.--ANY COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT SOFTWARE PROCURED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL ONLY BE USED INTERNALLY BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF SAFETY OF THE COMMUNITY, REVIEW AND IMPROVEMENT OF POLICING SERVICES AND TIMELY UPDATES ON KEY PERSONNEL AND CASE STATUS.(i) (J) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community engagement software." An accessible digital technology tool or platform that allows for customizable and automated public safety communications from a law enforcement agency to victims of crime and concerned citizens. The software shall also include a survey function that allows the law enforcement agency to gather information to improve services, track initiatives and identify issues."Law enforcement agency." A district attorney's office or a public agency of a political subdivision having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of the criminal or traffic laws."Program." The Public Safety Resident Communications Pilot Program established under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0627PN1947 - 3 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425